Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.50.110

Employment of legislators, board or commission members, or state employees—Statement, contents. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

If any person registered or required to be registered as a lobbyist, or any employer of any person registered or required to be registered as a lobbyist, employs a member or an employee of the legislature, a member of a state board or commission, or a full-time state employee, and that new employee remains in the partial employ of the state, the new employer must file within 15 days after employment a statement with the commission, signed under oath, setting out the nature of the employment, the name of the person employed, and the amount of pay or consideration.

[ 2024 c 164 s 483; 2010 c 204 s 810; 1973 c 1 s 21 (Initiative Measure No. 276, approved November 7, 1972). Formerly RCW 42.17A.645, 42.17.210.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Effective date—2010 c 204 ss 101-504, 506-601, 603-702, and 801-1103: See note following RCW 29B.15.010.

Effective date—Construction—1973 c 1: See notes following RCW 29B.05.010.